Hawaii, session 2025, SB565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Pololu Valley, on the northern coast of Hawaii Island, is a place of unparalleled natural beauty, characterized by its lush landscapes, diverse flora and fauna, and cultural significance to Native Hawaiians.  Pololu Valley serves as a vital ecosystem, providing habitat to various endemic and endangered species, contributing to the region's ecological balance, and offering invaluable opportunities for scientific research and environmental education. The legislature also finds that preserving and protecting Pololu Valley is essential to safeguarding its unique ecological, cultural, and historical attributes to benefit present and future generations.  Currently, high levels of tourism produce a significant impact on the area.  The lack of nearby restrooms and visitor education efforts have contributed to safety and litter issues, with plastics that are left behind on the trail eventually washing up on the shoreline.  Without active management, the condition of Pololu Valley will continue to deteriorate. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys to the division of forestry and wildlife of the department of land and natural resources for the management of Pololu Valley, including various improvements necessary for conservation and protection. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for Pololu Valley management and conservation, including: (1)  Development of the trailhead; (2)  Development of infrastructure necessary to accommodate parking; (3)  Installation of appropriate informational, historical, and educational signage; (4)  Design and construction of restroom facilities; (5)  Establishment of        full-time equivalent ( .0 FTE) positions to manage the trail area during operational hours; and (6)  Other provisions of the Pololu lookout management plan. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources division of forestry and wildlife for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________